Washington statutes.
RCW 18.155.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Advisory committee" means the sex offender treatment providers advisory committee established under RCW 18.155.100.

(2) "Certified sex offender treatment provider" means an individual who is a licensed psychologist, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed social worker, licensed mental health counselor, or psychiatrist as defined in RCW 71.05.020, who is certified to examine and treat sex offenders pursuant to chapters 9.94A and 13.40 RCW and sexually violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW.

(3) "Certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider" means an individual who is a licensed psychologist, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed social worker, licensed mental health counselor, licensed mental health counselor associate, licensed independent clinical social worker associate, licensed advanced social worker associate, licensed marriage and family therapist associate, or psychiatrist as defined in RCW 71.05.020, who is certified as an affiliate to examine and treat sex offenders pursuant to chapters 9.94A and 13.40 RCW and sexually violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW under the supervision of a qualified supervisor.

(4) "Department" means the department of health.

(5)(a) "Qualified supervisor" means:

(i) A person who meets the requirements for certification as a sex offender treatment provider;

(ii) A person who meets a lifetime experience threshold of having provided at least two thousand hours of direct sex offender specific treatment and assessment services and who continues to maintain professional involvement in the field; or

(iii) A person who meets a lifetime experience threshold of at least two years of full-time work in a state-run facility or state-run treatment program providing direct sex offender specific treatment and assessment services and who continues to maintain professional involvement in the field.

(b) A qualified supervisor not credentialed by the department as a sex offender treatment provider must sign and submit to the department an attestation form provided by the department stating under penalty of perjury that the qualified supervisor has met the requisite education, training, or experience requirements and that the qualified supervisor is able to substantiate the qualified supervisor's claim to have met the requirements for education, training, or experience.

(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(7) "Sex offender treatment provider" or "affiliate sex offender treatment provider" means a person who counsels or treats sex offenders accused of or convicted of a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030.

[ 2023 c 150 s 3; 2020 c 266 s 1; 2004 c 38 s 3; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 401. Prior: 2000 c 171 s 33; 2000 c 28 s 38; 1990 c 3 s 802.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 150: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Effective date—2004 c 38: See note following RCW 18.155.075.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Technical correction bill—2000 c 28: See note following RCW 9.94A.015.

Effective date—2000 c 28: See RCW 9.94A.921.